Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-733.01
Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of this state authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage of a child brought under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act or a law or procedure substantially similar to the act.

Laws 2015, LB415, § 29.